Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB261.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 617(A)(9) and 621.2(a)(6) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, are amended to read:Section 617. Conditions Subject to Which Policies Are to Be Issued.--(A) No such policy shall be delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this Commonwealth unless:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 * * *(9) A policy delivered or issued for delivery after January 1, 1968, under which coverage of a dependent of a policyholder terminates at a specified age shall, with respect to an unmarried child covered by the policy prior to the attainment of the age of nineteen who is incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of [mental retardation or physical handicap] an intellectual or physical disability and who became so incapable prior to attainment of age nineteen and who is chiefly dependent upon such policyholder for support and maintenance, not so terminate while the policy remains in force and the dependent remains in such condition, if the policyholder has within thirty-one days of such dependent's attainment of the limiting age submitted proof of such dependent's incapacity as described herein. The foregoing provisions of this paragraph shall not require an insurer to insure a dependent [who is a mentally retarded or physically handicapped] child who has an intellectual or physical disability where the policy is underwritten on evidence of insurability based on health factors set forth in the application or where such dependent child does not satisfy the conditions of the policy as to any requirement for evidence of insurability or other provisions of the policy, satisfaction of which is required for coverage thereunder to take effect. In any such case the terms of the policy shall apply with regard to the coverage or exclusion from coverage of such dependent.* * *Section 621.2. Group Accident and Sickness Insurance.--(a) Group accident and sickness insurance is hereby declared to be that form of accident and sickness insurance covering groups of 20250HB0261PN0169 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 persons defined in this section with or without one or more members of their families or one or more of their dependents, or covering one or more members of the families or one or more dependents of such groups or persons and issued upon the following basis:* * *(6) A policy delivered or issued for delivery on or after January 1, 1968 under which coverage of a dependent of an employe or other member of the insured group terminates at a specified age shall, with respect to an unmarried child covered by the policy prior to the attainment of the age of nineteen who is incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason of [mental retardation or physical handicap] intellectual or physical disability and who became so incapable prior to attainment of age nineteen and who is chiefly dependent upon such employe or member for support and maintenance, not so terminate while the insurance of the employe or member remains in force and the dependent remains in such condition, if the insured employe or member has within thirty-one days of such dependent's attainment of the termination age submitted proof of such dependent's incapacity as described herein. The foregoing provisions of this paragraph shall not require an insurer to insure a dependent [who is a mentally retarded or physically handicapped] child who has an intellectual or physical disability if the dependent is a child of an employe or other member of the insured group [where such] and the dependent does not satisfy the conditions of the group policy as to any requirements for evidence of insurability or other provisions as may be stated in the group policy required for coverage thereunder to take effect. In any such case the terms of the policy shall apply with regard to the 20250HB0261PN0169 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 coverage or exclusion from coverage of such dependent.* * *Section 2. Paragraph (3) of the definition of "community health reinvestment activity" in section 2501 of the act is amended to read:Section 2501. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Community health reinvestment activity." Community health services and projects that improve health care or make health care more accessible. The term includes funding, subsidization or provision of the following:* * *(3) Programs for the prevention and treatment of disease or injury, including [mental retardation] intellectual disabilities, mental disorders, mental health counseling or the promotion of health or wellness.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0261PN0169 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920